Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-3,123
Petition; sufficiency.

In case no protest is filed within the time provided in section 14-3,121, the city shall have the power, without further notice, to find, adjudge, and determine that such petition is regular, legal, and sufficient.

Laws 1959, c. 36, § 40, p. 209.